ko: 도어 스토퍼 디자인: 후크 모양; 웨지 모양; 기타
zh-CN: 门吸设计: 钩形; 楔形设计; 其他
zh-TW: 門吸設計: 鉤形; 楔; 其他
lt-LT: Durų stabdiklio dizainas: Kabliuko formos; Pleišto formos; Kita
sk-SK: Dizajn zarážky dverí: V tvare háčika; Klinovitého tvaru; Iné
ja: ドアストッパーの種類: フック型; くさび形; その他
pl: Konstrukcja ogranicznika drzwi: W kształcie haka; W kształcie klina; Inne
fi: Ovenpysäyttimen muotoilu: Koukun muotoinen; Kiilamainen; Muu
sl-SI: Zasnova zaustavljala vrat: V obliki kljuke; Klinaste oblike; Drugo
de: Design des Türstoppers: Hakenförmig; Keilförmig; Sonstiges
fr: Design de la butée de porte: En forme de crochet; En forme de coin; Autre
sv: Design på dörrstopp: Krokformad; Kilformig; Övrigt
pt-PT: Design do batente da porta: Em forma de gancho; Em forma de cunha; Outro
cs: Design dveřní zarážky: Ve tvaru háku; Klínový; Jiné
es: Diseño de protector anti cierre de puerta: En forma de gancho; En forma de cuña; Otros
ro-RO: Design opritor ușă: În formă de cârlig; În formă de pană; Altele
nb: Utforming av dørstopper: Krokformet; Kileformet; Annet
it: Modello di fermaporta: A forma di gancio; A forma di cuneo; Altro
hu: Ajtóütköző kialakítása: Horog alakú; Ék alakú; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบตัวกั้นประตู: รูปร่างคล้ายตะขอ; รูปทรงคล้ายลิ่ม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Formato do aparador de porta: Em forma de gancho; Em forma de borda; Outro
en: Door stopper design: Hook-shaped; Wedge-shaped; Other
tr: Kapı durdurucu tasarımı: Kanca şeklinde; Kama şeklinde; Diğer
el: Σχέδιο στοπ πόρτας: Σε σχήμα γάντζου; Σφηνοειδές; Άλλο
bg-BG: Дизайн на стопер за врата: С форма на кука; Клиновидна форма; Други
da: Dørstopperdesign: Krogformet; Kileformet; Andet
vi: Thiết kế chặn cửa: Hình móc; Hình nêm; Khác
ru: Конструкция дверного упора: В виде крючка; Клиновидный; Другой
hr-HR: Dizajn sigurnosnog zatvarača vrata: U obliku kuke; Klinastog oblika; Ostalo
nl: Ontwerp deurstopper: Haakvormig; Wigvormig; Andere